Utah statutes.
63G-6a-203.   Powers and duties of board.

(1)  In addition to making rules in accordance with Section 63G-6a-402 and the other provisions of this chapter, the board shall consider and decide matters of policy within the provisions of this chapter, including those referred to it by the chief procurement officer.

(2) (a)  The board may:

(i)  audit and monitor the implementation of its rules and the requirements of this chapter;

(ii)  upon the request of a procurement unit with an applicable rulemaking authority other than the board, review the procurement unit's proposed rules to ensure that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or rules made by the board; and

(iii)  approve the use of innovative procurement processes.

(b) Except as provided in Section 63G-6a-1702, the board may not exercise authority over:

(i)  the award or administration of any particular contract; or

(ii)  any dispute, claim, or litigation pertaining to any particular contract.

(3)  Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, the board does not have authority over a matter involving a procurement unit with independent procurement authority.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

